Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-7,108
Synchronizing patient's medications; coverage.

(1) Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, (a) any individual or group sickness and accident insurance policy, certificate, or subscriber contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state and any hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for policies that provide coverage for a specified disease or other limited-benefit coverage, and (b) any self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by federal law that provides coverage for prescription medications shall apply a prorated daily cost-sharing rate to prescriptions that are dispensed by a network pharmacy for a partial supply if the prescribing practitioner or pharmacist determines the fill or refill to be in the best interest of the patient and the patient requests or agrees to a partial supply for the purpose of synchronizing the patient's medications.

(2) A policy, certificate, contract, or plan provider shall not deny coverage for the dispensing of a medication that is dispensed by a network pharmacy on the basis that the dispensing is for a partial supply if the prescribing practitioner or pharmacist determines the fill or refill to be in the best interest of the patient and the patient requests or agrees to a partial supply for the purpose of synchronizing the patient's medications. The policy, certificate, contract, or plan shall allow a pharmacy to override any denial codes indicating that a prescription is being refilled too soon for purposes of medication synchronization.

(3) To be eligible for coverage under this section, the medication:

(a) Must be covered by the enrollee's health benefit plan or have been approved by a formulary exception process;

(b) Must meet the prior authorization or utilization management criteria specifically applicable to the medication under the health benefit plan on the date the request for synchronization is made;

(c) Must be used for treatment and management of a chronic illness;

(d) Must be a formulation that can be safely split into short-fill periods to achieve medication synchronization; and

(e) Must not be a controlled substance listed in Schedule II of section 28-405.

(4) A policy, certificate, contract, or plan provider shall not use payment structures incorporating prorated dispensing fees. Dispensing fees for partially filled or refilled prescriptions shall be paid in full for each prescription dispensed, regardless of any prorated daily cost-sharing for the beneficiary or fee paid for alignment services.

(5) For purposes of this section, synchronizing the patient's medications means the coordination of medications for a patient who has been prescribed two or more medications for one or more chronic conditions so that the patient's medications are refilled on the same schedule for a given time period.

(6) This section shall apply to any policy, certificate, contract, or plan that is delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state on or after September 7, 2019.

Laws 2019, LB442, § 1.